District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-364

Council approval of non-offsetting budget modifications; exclusions.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 142, Pub. L. 104-8, § 301(b)(2)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-364.